apertium-nio.nio.twol
Alphabet

a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o p q r s t u v w x y z
ɂ ń ɨ ŋ ə
Ɂ:ɂ Ɂ:0
H:h H:b
T:t T:ð T:d
K:k K:g
N:n N:0 N:ŋ
Ə:ə
U:u U:ü
I:i I:ɨ
S:s S:sj
C:0
%^n:0
%>:0
%^ODD:0
;

Sets
HARM = u ü i ɨ ;
Cons = b c d f g h j k l m n ŋ r s t v w x z č ɂ ;

Rules
"N in weak grades RG"
N:0 <=> [%^ODD: | :Cons] %>:0 _ [H: | T: | K: | S:] ;

"Vowel harmony simple"
VH:VX => :VX \HARM* _ ; where VH in (U U I I) 
                           VX in (u ü i ɨ) matched ;
